Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7892.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 16-22 of the General Laws entitled "Curriculum [See Title 16
Chapter 97 — the Rhode Island Board of Education Act]" is hereby amended by adding thereto the
following section:
16-22-39. Firewise education program.
(a) The department of elementary and secondary education shall, pursuant to rules and
regulations promulgated by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education, establish a
comprehensive collaborative course of instruction that provides students with accurate information
and instruction on risks of wildfires while creating an action plan to mitigate loss in case of a
wildfire. The department shall, pursuant to rules and regulations promulgated by the commissioner,
utilize Firewise USA to create the basic education program requirement at all K-12 schools in the
state.
(b) Upon written request to the school principal, a pupil not less than eighteen (18) years
of age or a parent or legal guardian of a pupil less than eighteen (18) years of age, within a
reasonable period of time after the request is made, shall be permitted to examine the curriculum
program instruction materials at the school in which their child is enrolled.
(c) The department and the commissioner shall schedule the presentation of the program
at the schools during any full week during March as an annual event.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005125
========
LC005125 - Page 2 of 3